test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-petos_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - petos: # Noun 'betrayal'
     petos+N+Sg+Nom: petos
     petos+N+Sg+Gen: petoksen
     petos+N+Sg+Acc: petoksen
     petos+N+Sg+Part: petosta
     petos+N+Sg+Ill: petoksee
     petos+N+Sg+Ine: petoksees
     petos+N+Sg+Ela: petoksest
     petos+N+Sg+All: petokselle
     petos+N+Sg+Ade: petokseel
     petos+N+Sg+Abl: petokselt
     petos+N+Sg+Tra: petokseks
     petos+N+Sg+Ess: petoksenna
     petos+N+Sg+Exe: petoksent

     petos+N+Pl+Nom: petokset
     petos+N+Pl+Gen: petoksin
     petos+N+Pl+Acc: petokset
     petos+N+Pl+Part: petoksia
     petos+N+Pl+Ill: petoksii
     petos+N+Pl+Ine: petoksiis
     petos+N+Pl+Ela: petoksist
     petos+N+Pl+All: petoksille
     petos+N+Pl+Ade: petoksiil
     petos+N+Pl+Abl: petoksilt
     petos+N+Pl+Tra: petoksiks
     petos+N+Pl+Ess: petoksinna
     petos+N+Pl+Exe: petoksint
